Illinois, session 104th, HB5467.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The sum of $5,000,000, or so much of that amount 5as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 6Fund to the Department of Human Services for Assisted 7Outpatient Treatment related projects. 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 92026.